test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-avaka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

# Authors: Liovina, Grishunina 2015

  Noun - авака: # Noun or attribute 'female/naaras' - limited paradigm would indicate word is attribute
     авака+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: авака
     авака+N+SP+Gen+Indef: авакань
     авака+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: авакат
     авака+N+Sg+Nom+Def: авакась
     авака+N+Sg+Gen+Def: авакать
     авака+N+Sg+Dat+Def: авакати
     авака+N+Pl+Nom+Def: авакатне
     авака+N+Pl+Gen+Def: авакатнень
     авака+N+Pl+Dat+Def: авакатненди
     авака+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: аваканя
